Washington statutes.
RCW 8.25.240

Special benefits to remaining property—Judgment—Maximum amounts—Offsets—Interest.

A judgment entered as a result of a trial on the matter of special benefits shall not exceed the previously established sum of (1) the fair market value of any property taken; (2) the amount of damages if any to a remainder of the property, without offsetting against either of them the amount of any special benefits accruing to a remainder of the property; (3) the interest at five percent per annum accrued thereon to the date of entry of the judgment.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 79 s 4.]